Utah statutes.
13-19-2.   Written authorization required.

Every person who engages in the shopping cart retrieval business shall retain records, showing written authorization from the merchant or owner to retrieve the carts and to be in possession of those carts retrieved, and shall maintain a copy of that authorization in any vehicle utilized for that retrieval.

